Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 05. Qualification of Voters.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 14-35.

Sec. 15.05.010.
Voter qualification.

A person may vote at any election who

is a citizen of the United States;

is 18 years of age or older;

has been a resident of the state and of the house district in which the person seeks to vote for at least 30 days just before the election; and

has registered before the election as required under AS 15.07 and is not registered to vote in another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1.01 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1972; am §§ 1, 38 ch 116 SLA 1972; am §§ 2, 3 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For moving from house district just before election, see AS

15.20.015

; for time for registration, see AS

15.07.040

.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative complaint procedure for violations of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, see 6 AAC 25, art. 2.

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 83, SLA 1960 (CSHB 252), see 1960 House Journal, pp. 139, 140.
For report on ch. 88, SLA 1969 (HB 100), see 1969 House Journal, p. 443.
For report on ch. 15, SLA 1970 (CSHB 346), see 1970 House Journal, p. 131. Related House Joint Resolution No. 51 is also reported on p. 131.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The qualifications of an absentee voter should be determined as of election day rather than the date the ballot is filled in and mailed. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 21.

If no judicial determination of unsound mind exists, and the person clearly wishes to register to vote, the division may not prevent the person from registering. August 28, 1992, Op. Att’y General.

Sec. 15.05.011.
Qualifications of overseas voters.

A person residing outside the United States may register and vote absentee by qualifying under this section.

Before registering a person under this section, the director shall determine that the person

was domiciled in the state immediately before leaving the United States;

meets the qualifications established in AS

15.05.010

(1) and (2);

has not established a domicile in another state, territory, or possession of the United States since leaving this state;

is not registered to vote and has not voted in another state, territory, or possession of the United States since leaving this state;

has a valid passport, card of identity and registration, or other identification issued under the authority of the United States Secretary of State, and identification complying with the requirements of this title.

Lack of a place of abode in the state or lack of intent to return to the state does not disqualify a person who qualifies under (b) of this section.

A person registered under this section may vote in a federal election in this state.

Notwithstanding (b)(1) of this section, a person residing outside the United States may register and vote absentee if

the parent or legal guardian of the person was domiciled in the state immediately before leaving the United States; and

the director determines that the person meets the requirements of (b)(2) — (5) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For house district in which a person is to be registered, see AS

15.07.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added (e).

Sec. 15.05.012.
Voter qualification for presidential election.

A person who is otherwise qualified under AS

15.05.010

but who has not been a resident of the house district in which the person seeks to vote for at least 30 days preceding the date of a presidential election is entitled to register and vote for presidential and vice-presidential candidates.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.05.014.
Procedures in presidential elections.

In accordance with the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (P.L. 89-110; 79 Stat. 437; 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq.), as amended, the following procedures apply to elections for the office of President and Vice-President of the United States:

registration and absentee voting procedures, except as otherwise provided in this section, shall be identical to the procedures established in this title;

registration of otherwise qualified persons shall be permitted without regard to a durational residency requirement;

if any citizen who is otherwise qualified to vote in the state for president and vice-president has begun residence in another state after the 30th day preceding the election and, for that reason, does not satisfy the registration requirements of that state, that person shall be allowed to vote for president and vice-president either in person in the precinct in which the person resided immediately before removal, or by absentee ballot as provided in AS 15.20.

History.

(§ 1 ch 69 SLA 1967; am § 3 ch 116 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section refers to 42 U.S.C. 1973, et seq. (National Voting Rights Act of 1965), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Sec. 15.05.016.
Fee prohibited. [Repealed, § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 15.05.020.
Rules for determining residence of voter.

For the purpose of determining residence for voting, the place of residence is governed by the following rules:

A person may not be considered to have gained a residence solely by reason of presence nor may a person lose it solely by reason of absence while in the civil or military service of this state or of the United States or of absence because of marriage to a person engaged in the civil or military service of this state or the United States, while a student at an institution of learning, while in an institution or asylum at public expense, while confined in public prison, while engaged in the navigation of waters of this state or the United States or of the high seas, while residing upon an Indian or military reservation, or while residing in the Alaska Pioneers’ Home or the Alaska Veterans’ Home.

The residence of a person is that place in which the person’s habitation is fixed, and to which, whenever absent, the person has the intention to return. If a person resides in one place, but does business in another, the former is the person’s place of residence. Temporary work sites do not constitute a dwelling place.

A change of residence is made only by the act of removal joined with the intent to remain in another place. There can only be one residence.

A person does not lose residence if the person leaves home and goes to another country, state, or place in this state for temporary purposes only and with the intent of returning.

A person does not gain residence in any place to which the person comes without the present intention to establish a permanent dwelling at that place.

A person loses residence in this state if the person votes in another state’s election, either in person or by absentee ballot, and will not be eligible to vote in this state until again qualifying under AS

15.05.010

.

The term of residence is computed by including the day on which the person’s residence begins and excluding the day of election.

The address of a voter as it appears on the official voter registration record is presumptive evidence of the person’s voting residence. This presumption is negated only if the voter notifies the director in writing of a change of voting residence.

History.

(§ 1.02 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1962; am §§ 2, 3 ch 136 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 228 SLA 1968; am §§ 4, 38 ch 116 SLA 1972; am §§ 4, 5 ch 197 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 11 SLA 1979; am § 3 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 111 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

The 2004 amendment renumbered the paragraphs within this section to reflect the repeal of former paragraphs (7) and (9) by sec. 38, ch. 116, SLA 1972.
Former paragraph (8) was renumbered as paragraph (7) and former paragraph (10) was renumbered as paragraph (8).

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 15.05.030.
Loss and restoration of voting rights.

A person convicted of a crime that constitutes a felony involving moral turpitude under state or federal law may not vote in a state, federal, or municipal election from the date of the conviction through the date of the unconditional discharge of the person. Upon the unconditional discharge, the person may register under AS 15.07.

The commissioner of corrections shall establish procedures by which a person unconditionally discharged is advised of the voter registration requirements and procedures.

History.

(§ 1.03 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 111 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 48, E.O. 55, “commissioner of corrections” was substituted for “commissioner of health and social services” in 1984 in subsection (b) of this section.

Cross references. —

For definition of “felony involving moral turpitude,” see AS

15.80.010

; for definition of “unconditional discharge,” see AS

15.80.010

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For a list of crimes which constitute felonies involving moral turpitude, see Nov. 7, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

A person under a sentence of imprisonment, whose conviction of a felony involving moral turpitude is the subject of an appeal, may not be a candidate for a seat on the school board of a rural educational attendance area, August 17, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

One whose conviction is on appeal may neither vote nor run for public office, June 27, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

A member of an REAA school board loses his or her seat upon conviction pending appeal. Upon conviction, the board member loses voter status and is thereby disqualified from holding the seat. The members of the board should entertain a motion to declare the seat vacant. If the motion passes, the remaining members may then fill the vacancy in accordance with former AS

14.08.041(e)

and AS

14.12.070

, June 27, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

The law currently prohibits the following classes of felons from voting or seeking elective office: (1) Persons convicted of crimes involving moral turpitude who are currently imprisoned; (2) Persons convicted of crimes involving moral turpitude who are on probation or parole; and (3) Persons convicted of crimes involving moral turpitude who received suspended sentences or suspended impositions of sentences that have not expired, January 29, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

What constitutes “conviction” within constitutional or statutory provision disfranchising one convicted of crime. 36 ALR2d 1238.

Effect of conviction under federal law, or law of another state or country, on right to vote or hold public office. 39 ALR3d 303.

What constitutes conviction within statutory or constitutional provision making conviction of crime ground of disqualification for, removal from, or vacancy in, public office. 10 ALR5th 139.

Sec. 15.05.040.
Voter disqualification for unsound mind. [Repealed, § 49 ch 86 SLA 1996.]